Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 1

Local Neighborhood Development Corporations Act of 1987

13-13-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Local Neighborhood Development Corporation Act of 1987.”

Acts 1987, ch. 343, § 1; 1992, ch. 864, § 1.

13-13-102. Legislative findings and declaration.

It is hereby found and declared that the state has certain communities which persistently suffer from the debilitating problems of chronic unemployment, below average educational attainment, low household income, and limited economic opportunity, that these problems may be assuaged with the proper and concentrated application of personnel and resources, that many of such debilitating conditions may be best addressed at the community level, and that existing community organizations often lack the requisite funding and expertise to implement necessary programs.

Therefore, it is found that it is in the public interest of the state to promote the prosperity and general welfare of the citizens within such communities, a public purpose for which public money may be expended, to provide technical and economic assistance to neighborhoods, and that the creation of local neighborhood development corporations will assist in serving this public purpose.

Acts 1987, ch. 343, § 1; 1992, ch. 864, § 2.

13-13-103. [Reserved.]

Local neighborhood development corporations in effect on July 1, 2001, shall remain in effect until such corporations are dissolved or the authority for such corporations is repealed.

Each local neighborhood development corporation shall be governed and its corporate powers exercised by a board of directors, which shall consist of not less than five (5) nor more than forty-five (45) members.

Each member of the board of directors shall remain a member until such time such member voluntarily resigns or is removed by the local board of directors for cause.

At least fifty-one percent (51%) of the appointments shall be persons who are residents of the neighborhood.

Local government officials in the jurisdiction in which such corporation is organized may also serve on the board.

The senator and member of the house of representatives in whose district the neighborhood is located shall serve as advisory, nonvoting members of the board.

Any person appointed to fill a vacancy in the office of a member shall be appointed by a majority of the members of the local board of directors.

Any member may be removed for cause from such member's appointment by the board of such member's local neighborhood development corporation.

Sixty percent (60%) of the total membership of the board shall constitute a quorum, and the affirmative vote of a majority of the members serving on the board shall be necessary for any action to be taken by the board. The members shall serve without compensation, but each member shall be entitled to reimbursement for such member's actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of such member's official duties as established by the board.

Each local neighborhood development corporation may purchase from, sell to, borrow from, loan to, contract with or otherwise deal with any eligible organization in which any director of such corporation is in any way interested or involved; provided, that such interest or involvement is disclosed in advance to the members of the board and recorded in the minutes of the board; and, provided further, that no director having such an interest or involvement may participate in any decision of the board relating to such eligible organization.

The directors shall annually elect one (1) of their members as chair and one (1) as vice chair and shall also designate a secretary who need not be a member of the board. The secretary shall keep a record of the proceedings of such neighborhood corporation and shall be the custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed with the corporation, the minute books of such corporation and its official seal. The secretary shall cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of such corporation and shall certify that such copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the corporation may rely upon such certification.

Acts 1987, ch. 343, §§ 3, 8; 1988, ch. 985, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 19, § 1; 1992, ch. 864, § 4; 1999, ch. 283, § 1; 2001, ch. 415, § 1.

13-13-105. Powers and duties of local neighborhood development corporations.

Each local neighborhood development corporation has the following general powers, functions and duties, to:

Make, amend and repeal bylaws, rules and regulations for the management of its affairs;

Adopt an official seal;

Sue and be sued, in its own name;

Make contracts and execute all instruments necessary or convenient for the exercise of its power and functions;

Acquire, own, hold and dispose of personal property of any nature, or any interest therein;

Enter into agreements or other transactions with any federal or state agency or political subdivision thereof;

Appear in its own behalf before boards, commissions, departments or other agencies of municipal, county, state or federal government;

Procure insurance against any losses in connection with its property in such amounts, and from such insurers, as may be necessary or desirable;

Apply for and accept grants, loans, advances and contributions from any source of money, property, labor or other things of value, to be held, used and applied for the purposes of this part;

Provide and pay for such advisory services and technical assistance as may be necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of this part;

Exercise any other powers of a corporation organized under the laws of this state;

Encourage and assist in the development and utilization of educational, vocational, and economic opportunities within the neighborhood;

Suggest more effective applications of and techniques for the delivery of governmental services and programs for residents of the neighborhood;

Undertake appropriate activities to foster a higher standard of living and a greater degree of economic self-sufficiency within the neighborhood; and

Do any and all things necessary or convenient to carry out its purposes and exercise the powers expressly granted in this part.

Acts 1987, ch. 343, § 4; 1992, ch. 864, § 5.

13-13-106. Economic assistance.

Each local neighborhood development corporation may, subject to appropriation by the general assembly or funds made available from any other public or private source and pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by it, provide economic assistance to particular eligible organizations or projects intended to contribute to the public purposes of this part generally; provided, that preference shall be given to projects in which community controlled organizations or community action programs have, or will have, an ownership interest; and provided further, that before providing economic assistance to a particular eligible organization, a neighborhood development corporation shall find and incorporate in its minutes that the eligible organization is devoting a substantial part of its efforts to activities intended to contribute to the economic, educational and social well-being of the neighborhood.

Acts 1987, ch. 343, § 5; 1992, ch. 864, § 6.

13-13-107. [Reserved.]

The books and records of a local neighborhood development corporation shall be subject to an annual audit by the comptroller of the treasury if the corporation has received a grant or appropriation from the state or any agency thereof.

Acts 1987, ch. 343, § 7; 1992, ch. 864, § 8.

13-13-109. Liberal construction of part.

This part, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

Acts 1987, ch. 343, § 9.